Utah statutes.
26-18-10.   Utah Medical Assistance Program -- Policies and standards.

(1)  The division shall develop a medical assistance program, which shall be known as the Utah Medical Assistance Program, for low income persons who are not eligible under the state plan for Medicaid under Title XIX of the Social Security Act or Medicare under Title XVIII of that act.

(2)  Persons in the custody of prisons, jails, halfway houses, and other nonmedical government institutions are not eligible for services provided under this section.

(3)  The department shall develop standards and administer policies relating to eligibility requirements, consistent with Subsection 26-18-3(8), for participation in the program, and for payment of medical claims for eligible persons.

(4)  The program shall be a payor of last resort.  Before assistance is rendered the division shall investigate the availability of the resources of the spouse, father, mother, and adult children of the person making application.

(5)  The department shall determine what medically necessary care or services are covered under the program, including duration of care, and method of payment, which may be partial or in full.

(6)  The department may not provide public assistance for medical, hospital, or other medical expenditures or medical services to otherwise eligible persons where the purpose of the assistance is for the performance of an abortion, unless the life of the mother would be endangered if an abortion were not performed.

(7)  The department may establish rules to carry out the provisions of this section.



Amended by Chapter 167, 2013 General Session

